District of Columbia statutes.
38-1921

Authorized; eligibility.

(a)

The Board of Education of the District of Columbia is authorized to participate in the teacher foreign exchange program in cooperation with the United States Office of Education.

(b)

Any employee of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia who is subject to the provisions of the District of Columbia Teachers’ Salary Act of 1955 [§§ 38-1963 to 38-1982, repealed] shall, with the approval of the Board of Education, be eligible to participate in such program, and shall, if accepted for such foreign assignment, serve for a period not to exceed one calendar year, and shall, at the conclusion of such service, be returned to the position which he held before the exchange was effected; provided, that in any one calendar year not more than 10 such employees shall participate in such program.

Sept. 28, 1950, 64 Stat. 1076, ch. 1091, § 1
“The District of Columbia Teachers’ Salary Act of 1955,” referred to in subsection (b) of this section, refers to the Act of August 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 521, ch. 569.
1973 Ed., § 31-699.
1981 Ed., § 31-1033.